Massachusetts, session 194th, H1535.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3A of Chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(d) The executive office of housing and livable communities, in consultation with the
executive office of economic development, the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority, and
the Massachusetts Department of Transportation, shall submit a report on or before December
31st every three years to the general court. The report shall evaluate the implementation and
outcomes of this section, including but not limited to:(i) the number and types of housing units
produced under this section;(ii) the impacts of such housing production on local infrastructure,
including water, sewer, and transportation systems; (iii) the effects on public schools, including
enrollment changes and funding needs; and (iv) recommendations for legislative or regulatory
changes to improve the effectiveness and sustainability of multi-family zoning requirements.
of 2

The report shall be filed with the clerks of the house of representatives and senate, the
joint committee on housing, and the joint committee on transportation.
of 2